Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
478

INTEREST
AND USURY

Section

478-1 Definitions

478-2 Legal rate; computation

478-3 On judgment

478-4 Rate by written contract

478-5 Usury not recoverable

478-6 Usury; penalty

478-7 Compound, not recoverable

478-8 Exemptions from usury

478-8.5 Repealed

478-9 Rejection of federal law

478-10, 11 Repealed

478-11.5 Credit cards

478-12 Renumbered

478-13 Repealed

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next